New York, session 2025-2026, S6203.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding three new sections 2 120.26, 120.27 and 120.28 to read as follows: 3 § 120.26 Definitions. 4 For the purposes of sections 120.27 and 120.28 of this article, "emer- 5 gency service person" shall mean any of the following persons: 6 1. a firefighter; 7 2. a police officer; 8 3. a peace officer; 9 4. an emergency services professional; 10 5. a code enforcement officer; 11 6. a fire inspection personnel; or 12 7. a building inspector. 13 § 120.27 Reckless endangerment of an emergency service person in the 14 second degree. 15 A person is guilty of reckless endangerment of an emergency service 16 person in the second degree when, knowing that a building permit is 17 required and without obtaining such permit, such person alters, 18 converts, encloses, subdivides or partitions any building or structure 19 in violation of the New York state uniform fire prevention and building 20 code or any other provision of general, special or local law, ordinance, 21 administrative code, rule or regulation addressing standards for build- 22 ing construction and fire prevention in a manner that impedes a person's EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08770-01-5 S. 6203 2 1 egress and during a fire or other emergency evacuation and such conduct 2 results in the injury of an emergency service person. 3 Reckless endangerment of an emergency service person in the second 4 degree is a class E felony. 5 § 120.28 Reckless endangerment of an emergency service person in the 6 first degree. 7 A person is guilty of reckless endangerment of an emergency service 8 person in the first degree when such person commits the crime of reck- 9 less endangerment of an emergency service person in the second degree 10 and: 11 1. during such fire or other emergency evacuation such conduct results 12 in the death of an emergency service person; or 13 2. has previously been convicted within the last ten years of reckless 14 endangerment of an emergency service person in the first or second 15 degree. 16 Reckless endangerment of an emergency service person in the first 17 degree is a class D felony. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 19 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.